District of Columbia statutes.
2-1401.04

Severability of provisions.

If any provision, or part thereof of this chapter or application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter and the application of the provision, or part thereof, to other persons not similarly situated or to other circumstances is not to be affected thereby.

History

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title I, § 104, 24 DCR 6038

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2504.
1973 Ed., § 6-2204.